Georgia, session 2025_26, HB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 2-1-7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to prohibiting the
acquisition of possessory interest in certain land by certain foreign persons and entities, is
amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(2.1) 'Military installation' means a facility owned and operated by the United States
Army, Air Force, Navy, Marines, Space Force, or Coast Guard that shelters military
equipment and personnel and facilitates training and operations for such organizations."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 358
- 1 -